Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,106
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 76-2,106 to 76-2,108, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Dual contracts shall mean two written contracts entered into between identical contracting persons in identical capacities concerning the same parcel of real property, one of which states the true and actual purchase price and one of which states a purchase price in excess of the true and actual purchase price and is used as an inducement to make a loan commitment on such real property in reliance upon the stated inflated value; and

(2) Fraudulent instrument shall mean any paper, document, or other form in writing that is intentionally used as subterfuge or device to induce the making of a loan or the extension of credit as a part of a transaction whereby either the title to real property is transferred or valuable improvements are placed on real property in this state, whether for the benefit of the inducer or another.

Laws 1969, c. 610, § 1, p. 2476.